Utah statutes.
57-19-10.   Effect of application or registration -- Misleading statements
to prospective purchasers a misdemeanor.
Neither the fact that an application for registration or the written
disclosures required by this chapter have been filed, nor the fact that a
project has been effectively registered or exempted, constitutes a finding by
the director that the offering or any document filed under this chapter is
true, complete, and not misleading, nor does either of these facts mean that
the director has determined in any way the merits or qualifications of, or
recommended or given approval to, any person, developer, or transaction
involving an interest in a project.  It is a class A misdemeanor to make or
cause to be made to any purchaser or prospective purchaser any offering or
document filed under this chapter which is untrue, incomplete, or misleading.
